Montana, session 2025, SB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 20-7-1310, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-1310. Youth suicide awareness and prevention training. (1) This section may be cited as
the "Suicide Awareness and Prevention Training Act".
(2) The office of public instruction shall provide guidance and technical assistance to Montana
schools on youth suicide awareness and prevention training materials. All training materials offered must be
approved by the office of public instruction, meet the standards for professional development in the state, and
be periodically reviewed by a qualified person or committee for consistency with generally accepted principles
of youth suicide awareness and prevention training. The office of public instruction, in consultation with the
department of public health and human services, shall ensure low-cost and no-cost training options for schools.
(3) The legislature recommends that youth Youth suicide awareness and prevention training must
be made available annually to each employee of a school district and to staff of the office of public instruction
who work directly with any students enrolled in Montana public schools. The training must be provided at no
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 369
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 369
cost to the employee. The training may be offered through any method of training identified in subsection (4).
(4) The legislature recommends that employees Employees under subsection (3) shall take at
least 2 hours 1 hour of youth suicide awareness and prevention training every 5 3 years. Appropriate methods
for delivery of the training include:
(a) in-person attendance at a live training;
(b) videoconference;
(c) an individual program of study of designated materials;
(d) self-review modules available online; and
(e) any other method chosen by the local school board that is consistent with professional
development standards.
(5) The trustees of a school district shall establish policies, procedures, or plans related to suicide
prevention and response. The policies, procedures, or plans must include a description of the youth suicide
awareness and prevention training requirements for school district employees pursuant to subsections (3) and
(4).
(6) No cause of action may be brought for any loss or damage caused by any act or omission
resulting from the implementation of the provisions of this section or resulting from any training or lack of
training related to this section. Nothing in this section may be construed to impose a specific duty of care."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 369
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 369, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 369
INTRODUCED BY M. YAKAWICH
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING SCHOOL YOUTH SUICIDE PREVENTION LAWS; STRENGTHENING
YOUTH SUICIDE PREVENTION EFFORTS IN MONTANA SCHOOLS; REQUIRING THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION TO ENSURE LOW-COST AND NO-COST OPTIONS FOR YOUTH SUICIDE AWARENESS
AND PREVENTION TRAINING; REQUIRING YOUTH SUICIDE AWARENESS AND PREVENTION TRAINING
FOR CERTAIN OFFICE OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION EMPLOYEES AND FOR SCHOOL DISTRICT
EMPLOYEES; REQUIRING THAT THE POLICIES, PROCEDURES, OR PLANS RELATED TO SUICIDE
PREVENTION AND RESPONSE DEVELOPED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF
YOUTH SUICIDE AWARENESS AND PREVENTION TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR SCHOOL DISTRICT
EMPLOYEES; AMENDING SECTION 20-7-1310, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”